Utah statutes.
53-10-402.   Bureau duties.
The bureau shall:
(1)  provide quality, timely, and comprehensive analysis of physical evidence
from crime scenes and crime-related incidents submitted by federal, state,
county, and municipal criminal justice agencies;
(2)  provide expert testimony in courts of law regarding the scientific
analysis and conclusion of forensic evidence using the most current and
advanced analytical techniques and technology;
(3)  ensure the safety of all laboratory employees against exposure to blood-
borne pathogens, infectious materials, and any other biochemical or toxic
hazard which may pose a threat to the safety and well-being of bureau
employees;
(4)  protect the chain of incoming evidence by ensuring all items are properly
packaged, sealed, marked, stored, and delivered back to the submitting agency
using established legal guidelines;
(5)  adopt systems of identification, including blood and firearms analysis,
to be used by the division to facilitate law enforcement;
(6)  participate in establishing satellite laboratories in designated
locations throughout the state;
(7)  provide assistance to the medical community in establishing guidelines
for the  proper handling of individuals who are the victims of sexual assault;
and
(8)  upon request, provide law enforcement agencies technical and analytical
support in the processing of crime scenes.
